Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.110

Findings of fact—Order—Report.

(1) In the event of a finding of unprofessional conduct, the disciplining authority shall prepare and serve findings of fact and an order as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act. If the license holder or applicant is found to have not committed unprofessional conduct, the disciplining authority shall forthwith prepare and serve findings of fact and an order of dismissal of the charges, including public exoneration of the licensee or applicant. The findings of fact and order shall be retained by the disciplining authority as a permanent record.

(2) The disciplining authority shall report the issuance of statements of charges and final orders in cases processed by the disciplining authority to:

(a) The person or agency who brought to the disciplining authority's attention information which resulted in the initiation of the case;

(b) Appropriate organizations, public or private, which serve the professions;

(c) The public. Notification of the public shall include press releases to appropriate local news media and the major news wire services; and

(d) Counterpart licensing boards in other states, or associations of state licensing boards.

(3) This section shall not be construed to require the reporting of any information which is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2005 c 274 s 232; 1989 c 175 s 70; 1984 c 279 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.